Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.100

Rejection of claim—Time limits—Notice—Compromise of claim.

(1) If the personal representative rejects a claim, in whole or in part, the claimant must bring suit against the personal representative within thirty days after notification of rejection or the claim is forever barred. The personal representative shall notify the claimant of the rejection and file an affidavit with the court showing the notification and the date of the notification. The personal representative shall notify the claimant of the rejection by personal service or certified mail addressed to the claimant or the claimant's agent, if applicable, at the address stated in the claim. The date of service or of the postmark is the date of notification. The notification must advise the claimant that the claimant must bring suit in the proper court against the personal representative within thirty days after notification of rejection or the claim will be forever barred.

(2) The personal representative may, before or after rejection of any claim, compromise the claim, whether due or not, absolute or contingent, liquidated, or unliquidated, if it appears to the personal representative that the compromise is in the best interests of the estate.

[ 1997 c 252 s 16; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 47; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.100. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 116; RRS s 1486; prior: Code 1881 s 1476; 1854 p 281 s 88.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.